New Mexico, session 2026, HB169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.-- A. Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the board of regents of the university of New Mexico for the department of Chicana and Chicano studies for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to provide year-round scholarships to and year-round outreach for the curanderismo traditional medicine institute as provided in this section. B. Curanderismo traditional medicine institute scholarships shall be prioritized for New Mexico residents, persons from rural, tribal, indigenous or underserved communities or persons who intend to provide culturally rooted healing, wellness or community health services within New Mexico. C. The statewide outreach and engagement shall include courses; informational sessions; workshops; culturally appropriate materials; engagement with tribal governments, underserved communities, acequia communities and rural and frontier populations; recruitment of participants from diverse New Mexico communities to participate in traditional and heritage medicinal education; and collaboration with community-based organizations to expand awareness of traditional healing education and pathways. D. The department of Chicana and Chicano studies shall research, study and create new courses on curanderismo traditional medicine to meet the cultural and health needs of New Mexico communities. E. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -